Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-311
Compensation contracts contingent upon outcome of municipal election; prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for the mayor and city council of any city, or the chairperson and board of trustees of any village, to contract with, retain, or employ any person, firm, or corporation upon the basis that the amount of the fees or compensation to be paid shall be contingent or depend, in whole or in part, upon the outcome of any municipal election.

Laws 1947, c. 49, § 2, p. 169;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 11.